New Mexico, session 2026, HB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 1-1-7.2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1973, Chapter 228, Section 5, as amended) is amended to read: "1-1-7.2. PETITIONS--NOMINATIONS--SIGNATURES TO BE COUNTED.-- [A. A person who signs a nominating petition shall sign only one petition for the same office unless more than one candidate is to be elected to that office, and in that case, a person may sign not more than the number of nominating petitions equal to the number of candidates to be elected to the office. B.] A. A person who signs a nominating petition shall indicate the person's registration address. If the person does not have a standard street address, the person may provide the mailing address as shown on the person's certificate of registration. [C.] B. A signature shall be counted on a nominating petition unless there is evidence presented that the petition does not provide the information required by the nominating petition for each person signing or the person signing: (1) is not a voter of the state, district, county or area to be represented by the office for which the person seeking the nomination is a candidate; [(2) has signed more than one petition for the same office, except as provided in Subsection A of this section, and if the person has signed more than one petition for the same office and in the same election cycle, none of the challenged signatures from that person shall count toward the total number of signatures required for any candidate for that office; (3)] (2) has signed one petition more than once, in which case only one signature from that person shall count toward the total number of signatures required for that candidate for office; [(4)] (3) in a primary election, is not of the same political party as the candidate named in the nominating petition as shown by the signer's certificate of registration or is not a person who has declined to state a political party preference on the signer's certificate of registration; or [(5)] (4) is not the person whose name appears on the nominating petition. [D.] C. The procedures set forth in this section shall be used to validate signatures on any petition required by the Election Code, except that Paragraph [(4)] (3) of Subsection [C] B of this section shall not apply to petitions filed by unaffiliated candidates or petitions filed by candidates of minor political parties. [E.] D. No later than January 1, 2024, the secretary of state shall implement a secure internet application, in addition to the paper circulation process, to gather electronic signatures in accordance with rules developed by the secretary of state. The secure internet application shall provide for the ability to verify that a person signing the petition is a registered voter and is eligible to sign the petition for a particular candidate." SECTION 2. Section 1-8-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1969, Chapter 240, Section 152, as amended) is amended to read: "1-8-2. NOMINATION BY MINOR POLITICAL PARTY--CONVENTION--DESIGNATED NOMINEES.-- A. If the rules of a minor political party require nomination by political convention: (1) the chair and secretary of the state political convention shall certify to the secretary of state the names of their party's nominees for United States senator, United States representative, all elective state offices, legislative offices elected from multicounty districts, all elective judicial officers in the judicial department and all offices representing a district composed of more than one county; and (2) the chair and secretary of the county political convention shall certify to the county clerk the names of their party's nominees for elected county offices and for legislative offices elected from a district located wholly within one county or that is composed of only one county. B. The names certified to the secretary of state shall be filed on the twenty-third day following the primary election in the year of the general election and shall be accompanied by a nominating petition containing the signatures of voters totaling not less than one percent of the total number of votes cast for governor at the last preceding general election at which a governor was elected: (1) in the state for statewide offices; provided that if there are fewer members of the minor party registered to vote in the state for statewide offices or registered to vote in the district for offices other than statewide offices than the number of signatures required for that office, a nominating petition shall contain the signatures of voters totaling not less than the required number of signatures of voters for independent candidates for the same office; and provided further that for the public education commission, a nominating petition shall be signed by at least two-thirds of the number of signatures that would otherwise be required, and for a judicial office, a nominating petition shall be signed by two-thirds of the number of signatures that would otherwise be required; and (2) in the district for offices other than statewide offices. The petition shall contain a statement that the voters signing the petition are residents of the area to be represented by the office for which the person being nominated is a candidate. C. The names certified to the county clerk shall be filed on the twenty-third day following the primary election in the year of the general election and shall be accompanied by a nominating petition containing the signatures of voters totaling not less than one percent of the total number of votes cast for governor at the last preceding general election at which a governor was elected: (1) in the county for countywide offices; and (2) in the district for offices other than countywide offices; provided that if there are fewer members of the minor party registered to vote in the county for countywide offices or registered to vote in the district for offices other than countywide offices than the number of signatures required for that office, a nominating petition shall contain the signatures of voters totaling not less than the required number of signatures of voters for independent candidates for the same office; and provided further that for a judicial office, a nominating petition shall be signed by two-thirds of the number of signatures that would otherwise be required. The petition shall contain a statement that the voters signing the petition are residents of the area to be represented by the office for which the person being nominated is a candidate. D. Except in the case of a political party certified in the year of the election, persons certified as candidates shall be members of that party on the day the secretary of state issues the general election proclamation. E. When a political party is certified in the year of the general election, and after the day the secretary of state issues the general election proclamation, a person certified as a candidate shall be: (1) a member of that party not later than the date the political party filed its rules and qualifying petitions pursuant to Sections 1-7-2 and 1-7-4 NMSA 1978; and (2) a resident in the district of the office for which the person is a candidate on the date of the secretary of state's proclamation for the general election or in the case of a person seeking the office of United States senator or United States representative, a resident within New Mexico on the date of the secretary of state's proclamation for the general election. No person who is a candidate for a party in a primary election may be certified as a candidate for a different party in the general election in the same election cycle. [F. No voter shall sign a petition prescribed by this section for more persons than the number of candidates necessary to fill the office at the next ensuing general election.]" SECTION 3. Section 1-8-30 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1973, Chapter 228, Section 4, as amended) is amended to read: "1-8-30. PRIMARY ELECTION LAW--DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY--NOMINATING PETITION--FILING AND FORM.-- A. As used in the Primary Election Law, "nominating petition" means the authorized form used for obtaining the required number of signatures of voters, which is signed on behalf of the person wishing to become a candidate for a political office in the primary election requiring a nominating petition. B. In making a declaration of candidacy, the candidate at the same time shall file a nominating petition, which shall be on the form prescribed by law. C. The nominating petition shall be on paper approximately eight and one-half inches wide and eleven inches long with numbered lines for signatures spaced approximately three-eighths of an inch apart and shall be in the following form: "NOMINATING PETITION I, the undersigned, a registered voter of New Mexico, and a member of the _______________ party or a person who has declined to state a political party preference on my certificate of registration, hereby nominate _________________, who resides at __________________ in the county of _______________, New Mexico, for the party nomination for the office of ______________________, to be voted for at the primary election to be held on _____, and I declare that I am a registered voter of the state, district, county or area to be represented by the office for which the person being nominated is a candidate. [I also declare that I have not signed, and will not sign, any nominating petition for more persons than the number of candidates necessary to fill such office at the next ensuing general election.] 1. _____________ _______________ ______________ __________ (usual        (name printed   (address as    (city or signature)    as registered)  registered)    zip code) 2. _____________ _______________ ______________ __________ (usual         (name printed   (address as   (city or signature)     as registered)  registered)   zip code).". D. In October of odd-numbered years, the secretary of state shall post on the secretary of state's [web site] website and shall furnish to each county clerk a sample of a nominating petition form, a copy of which shall be made available by the county clerk upon request of any candidate. E. When more than one sheet is required for a petition, each of the sheets shall be in the form prescribed by this section and all sheets shall be firmly secured by a staple or other suitable fastening." SECTION 4. Section 1-8-50 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1977, Chapter 322, Section 6, as amended) is amended to read: "1-8-50. INDEPENDENT CANDIDATES FOR GENERAL OR UNITED STATES REPRESENTATIVE SPECIAL ELECTIONS--NOMINATING PETITION FORM.-- A. As used in Sections 1-8-45 through 1-8-52 NMSA 1978, "nominating petition" means the authorized form used for obtaining the required number of signatures of voters that is signed on behalf of the person wishing to become an independent candidate for a political office in a general or United States representative special election requiring a nominating petition. B. In making a declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall file a nominating petition at the same time, which shall be on forms prescribed by law. C. The nominating petition for an independent candidate for any office except president of the United States shall be on paper approximately eight and one-half inches wide and eleven inches long with numbered lines for signatures spaced approximately three-eighths of an inch apart and shall be in the following form: "NOMINATING PETITION FOR INDEPENDENT CANDIDACY I, the undersigned, a registered voter of New Mexico, hereby nominate ____________________________, who resides at _________________________ in the county of _______________, New Mexico, as an independent candidate for the office of _________________________, to be voted for at the general election, or United States representative special election to be held on ____________________,__________ (month) (day) (year) and I declare that I am a registered voter of the state, district, county or area to be represented by the office for which the person being nominated is a candidate. [I also declare that I have not signed, and will not sign, any nominating petition for more persons than the number of candidates necessary to fill the office at the next ensuing general election or at a United States representative special election.] 1. _____________ ______________ ____________ ___________ (usual        (name printed   (address as   (city or zip signature)    as registered)  registered)   code) 2. _____________ ______________ ____________ ___________ (usual        (name printed   (address as   (city or zip signature)    as registered)  registered)   code).". D. The nominating petition for an independent candidate for the office of president of the United States shall be on paper approximately eight and one-half inches wide and eleven inches long with numbered lines for signatures spaced approximately three-eighths of an inch apart and shall be in the following form: "NOMINATING PETITION FOR INDEPENDENT CANDIDACY FOR THE OFFICE OF PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES I, the undersigned, a registered voter of New Mexico, by endorsement hereon, petition that the name of ____________ be printed on the general election ballot as an independent candidate for the office of president of the United States, to be voted on at the general election to be held on November _________, _____. I also declare that I am that person whose name appears hereon [and that I have not signed, nor will I sign, any nominating petition for any other candidate seeking the office of president of the United States at the next ensuing general election].". E. In March of even-numbered years, the secretary of state shall post on the secretary of state's [web site] website and shall furnish to each county clerk a sample of the nominating petition form, a copy of which shall be made available by the county clerk upon request of any candidate as provided by the Election Code. F. When more than one sheet is required for a petition, each of the sheets shall be in the form prescribed by this section, and all sheets shall be firmly secured by a staple or other suitable fastening." SECTION 5. Section 1-8-51 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1977, Chapter 322, Section 7, as amended) is amended to read: "1-8-51. INDEPENDENT CANDIDATES FOR GENERAL OR UNITED STATES REPRESENTATIVE ELECTIONS--NOMINATING PETITIONS--REQUIRED NUMBER OF SIGNATURES.-- A. The basis of percentage for the total number of votes cast in each instance referred to in this section shall be the total vote cast for governor at the last preceding general election at which a governor was elected. B. Nominating petitions for an independent candidate for president of the United States shall be signed by a number of voters equal to the number of signatures required to form a new political party. C. Nominating petitions for an independent candidate for United States senator or any other statewide elective office shall be signed by a number of voters equal to at least [two] one percent of the total number of votes cast in the state. D. Nominating petitions for an independent candidate for United States representative shall be signed by a number of voters equal to at least [two] one percent of the total number of votes cast in the district. E. Nominating petitions for an independent candidate for a member of the legislature, district judge, district attorney or county office shall be signed by a number of voters equal to at least [two] one percent of the total number of votes cast in the district, division or county, as the case may be; provided that for the public education commission, nominating petitions shall be signed by at least two-thirds of the number of signatures that would otherwise be required, and for a judicial office, nominating petitions shall be signed by at least two-thirds of the number of signatures that would otherwise be required. F. When a vacancy for any office occurs on the general election ballot pursuant to Section 1-8-7 or 1-8-8 NMSA 1978 in which all political parties may name a general election candidate or when a vacancy occurs in the office of United States representative pursuant to Section 1-15-18.1 NMSA 1978, an independent candidate may file a declaration of candidacy on or by the same deadline applicable to the political parties. The nominating petitions for an independent candidate in such circumstances shall be signed by the number of voters provided in this section, unless there are fewer than: (1) sixty days from the announcement of the vacancy to the last day to file a declaration of candidacy, in which case an independent candidate shall submit nominating petitions signed by a number of voters equal to two-thirds the number of voters otherwise required by this section for an independent candidate; or (2) thirty days from the announcement of the vacancy to the last day to file a declaration of candidacy, in which case an independent candidate shall submit nominating petitions signed by a number of voters equal to one-third the number of voters otherwise required by this section for an independent candidate. [G. A voter shall not sign a petition for an independent candidate as provided in this section if the voter has signed a petition for another independent candidate for the same office.]" SECTION 6. Section 1-8-65 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2014, Chapter 40, Section 7 and Laws 2014, Chapter 81, Section 7) is amended to read: "1-8-65. MINOR POLITICAL PARTY CANDIDATES FOR GENERAL OR UNITED STATES REPRESENTATIVE SPECIAL ELECTIONS--NOMINATING PETITION FORM.-- A. As used in Sections 1-8-2 through 1-8-4 NMSA 1978, "nominating petition" means the authorized form used for obtaining the required number of signatures of voters that is signed on behalf of the person wishing to become a minor political party candidate for a political office in a general or United States representative special election requiring a nominating petition. B. In making a declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall file a nominating petition at the same time, which shall be on forms prescribed by law. C. The nominating petition for a minor political party candidate for any office requiring a nominating petition shall be on paper approximately eight and one-half inches wide and eleven inches long with numbered lines for signatures approximately three-eighths inch apart and shall be in the following form: "NOMINATING PETITION FOR MINOR POLITICAL PARTY CANDIDACY (GENERAL ELECTION) I, the undersigned, a registered voter of New Mexico, hereby nominate ___________________, who resides at _______________ in the county of __________________, New Mexico, for the _______________ party nomination for the office of _______________________ to be voted for at the general election or United States representative special election to be held on _________, and I declare that I am a registered voter of the area to be represented by the office for which the person being nominated is a candidate. [I also declare that I have not signed, and will not sign, any nominating petition for more persons than the number of candidates necessary to fill such office at the next ensuing general election or at a United States representative special election.] I understand that if the candidate's political party does not qualify as a minor political party, the candidate may run as an unaffiliated independent candidate. 1. _____________ _____________ _____________ _____________ (usual signature) (name printed (address as   (city or zip as registered) registered)   code) 2. _____________ _____________ _____________ _____________ (usual signature) (name printed (address as   (city or zip as registered) registered)   code)". D. In March of even-numbered years, the secretary of state shall post on the secretary of state's [web site] website and shall furnish to each county clerk a sample of a nominating petition form, a copy of which shall be made available by the county clerk upon request of any candidate. E. When more than one sheet is required for a petition, each of the sheets shall be in the form prescribed by this section." SECTION 7. Section 1-15A-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1977, Chapter 230, Section 5) is amended to read: "1-15A-6. NOMINATION BY PETITION.--No later than 5:00 p.m. on the thirtieth day following the nominations by committee, any person seeking the endorsement by the national political party for the office of president of the United States, or any group organized in this state on behalf of, and with the consent of, such person, may submit to the secretary of state a petition on a form prescribed and furnished by the secretary of state to have such candidate's name printed on the presidential primary ballot. The petition shall be signed by a number of registered voters in each of the congressional districts equal to not less than two percent of the total number of votes for president cast in each district at the last preceding presidential election. [Each signer of such petition shall sign but one such petition.] In verifying the petition, the secretary of state shall count each signature unless it is determined that the person signing is not a registered voter of this state [has signed more than one petition] or is not the person whose name appears on the nominating petition. If a person signing has signed one petition more than once, only one signature from that person shall count toward the total number of signatures required for that candidate for office." SECTION 8. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is July 1, 2026. - 17 -